Massachusetts, session 194th, H4596.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. (a) The Massachusetts General Court shall establish a Massachusetts Digital 
Navigation Commission to study and make recommendations on ways to address the inequity of 
digital access through the recruitment and implementation of digital navigators, trusted guides 
who assist community members with ongoing, individualized support for accessing affordable 
and appropriate connectivity, devices, and digital skills. 
(b) The commission shall consist of: 1 member who shall represent the executive office 
of technology services and security; 1 member who shall represent the executive office of labor 
and workforce development; 1 member who shall represent the executive office of elder affairs; 
1 member who shall represent the department of public health;1 member who shall represent the 
Alliance for Digital Equity of Western Massachusetts; 1 member who shall represent 
Massachusetts Board of Library Commissioners; 1 member who shall represent MassHealth; 1 
member who shall represent Tech Goes Home; 1 member who shall represent Vinfen; 1 member 

of 3 13 who shall represent the Massachusetts League of Community Health Centers and 1 member who 
shall represent the Massachusetts Healthy Aging Collaborative.  
(c) The commission shall study and make recommendations on: 
(1) how Massachusetts residents’ needs can be met by digital navigation services within 
the broader goal of digital equity; 
(2) the scope and social determinant of health and quality of life outcomes provided 
through digital navigation; 
(3) opportunities for state agencies to support the work of digital navigation to further the 
goals of the agencies in meeting the needs of Massachusetts residents; 
(4) methods for funding digital navigators including private and public contracting, state 
grantmaking, and state and federal reimbursement for services; 
(5) qualifications and standards of digital navigators, including outlining a process for a 
statewide credentialing program for digital navigators; and 
(6) any other considerations determined to be relevant by the commission. 
(d) The commission shall also collect data regarding current regional digital navigation 
initiatives across the Commonwealth to understand opportunities, implementation design and 
statewide efficiencies. 
(e) All appointments shall be made not later than 30 days after the effective date of this 
resolve. The chairs shall meet with the commission not later than 60 days after the effective date 
of this resolve. 

of 3 33  (f) The commission shall file a report and its recommendations, including any legislation 
necessary to implement its recommendations, with the clerks of the house of representatives and 
the senate not later than six months after the effective date of this statute.